Hawaii statutes.
PART IX.
ASSISTANCE TO SMALL BUSINESSES

§103D-901 Definitions. As used in this
part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Geographic bidding" includes the use
of a competitive solicitation which provides for one or more contracts to be
awarded on a regional or geographic basis with the State.

"Small business" means a business
that is independently owned and defined by detailed criteria pursuant to rules
adopted by the policy board. The policy board shall adopt rules defining
"small business" through detailed criteria that may include the
number of employees and similar factors used by the United States Small
Business Administration. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 186, §17; am L
1997, c 352, §23; am L 2005, c 50, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next